src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON IJE_ODD_SG
N_ODD_SG_Px ;

       +Nom:e%^NOMAGieDISIMP    FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPn FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:%>asse              FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse >Jesusasse
       +Ine:%>isnie             FINAL1 ;
       +Ine+Err/Orth:%>esne             FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:%>istie             FINAL1 ;
       +Ela+Err/Orth:%>este             FINAL1 ;
       +Com:%>inie              FINAL1 ;


LEXICON IJE_ODD_PL
         +Nom:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>idie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>idie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>inie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijstie                 FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON IJE_ODD_ESS
 +Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON DAKTERE
   +Der1+Der/Rec+N:             LAAHKOEH_ODD   ;
               +Sg:             N_ODD_SG       ;
               +Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                                N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: daktere # Odd-syllable test
!!€ daktere:             daktere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ dakteren:            daktere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ dakterem:            daktere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ daktarasse:          daktere+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ daktarisnie:         daktere+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ daktaristie:         daktere+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Sg+Com
!!€ dakterh:             daktere+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ daktaridie:          daktere+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ dakteri:             daktere+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ daktaridie:          daktere+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ daktarijstie:        daktere+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ dakterigujmie:       daktere+N+Pl+Com
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Ess
!!€ daktaradtje:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ daktaradtjen:        daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ daktaradtjem:        daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ daktaradtjese:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ daktaradtjesne:      daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ daktaradtjeste:      daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess
!!€ daktaradtjh:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ daktaradtji:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ daktaradtjide:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ daktaradtjide:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ daktaradtjijste:     daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ daktaradtjigujmie:   daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess 


LEXICON IJEENERE_LOAN
             +Err/Orth:^eenar N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:^enar  N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:jenar  N_ODD ;
                      :jeenar N_ODD ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:^ener  R     ; !italiener-

!!€gt-norm: australijeenere # Even-syllable test
!!€ australijeenere:                australijeenere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ australijeenerem:               australijeenere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ australijeeneren:	            australijeenere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ australijeenaristie:            australijeenere+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON IJAANERE_LOAN
             +Err/Orth:^aanar N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:^anar  N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:janar  N_ODD ;
                      :jaanar N_ODD ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:^aner  R     ; !indianer-

!!€gt-norm: sisilijaanere # Even-syllable test
!!€ sisilijaanere:                sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sisilijaanerem:               sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ sisilijaaneren:	              sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ sisilijaanaristie:            sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON IJAATORE_LOAN
    +Err/Orth:^aator N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:^ator  N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:jator  N_ODD ;
             :jaator N_ODD ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ator  R     ; !gladiator-

!!€gt-norm: radijaatore # Even-syllable test
!!€ radijaatore:                  radijaatore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ radijaatorem:                 radijaatore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ radijaatoren:	              radijaatore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ radijaatorisnie:	          radijaatore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ radijaatoristie:	          radijaatore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ radijaatorinie:	              radijaatore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON IJAANOVE_LOAN
    +Err/Orth:^aanov N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:^anov  N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:janov  N_ODD ;
             :jaanov N_ODD ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ano   R     ; !piano-

!!€gt-norm: pijaanove # ODD-syllable test
!!€ pijaanove:                  pijaanove+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ pijaanovem:                 pijaanove+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ pijaanoven:	                pijaanove+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ pijaanovisnie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ pijaanovistie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ pijaanovinie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Com
! add some more iano-words?



LEXICON OVE_LOAN
    :ov N_ODD ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:o   R     ; !euro-

!!€gt-norm: eurove # ODD-syllable test
!!€ eurove:                     eurove+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ eurovem:                    eurove+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ euroven:	                eurove+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ eurovisnie:	            eurove+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ eurovistie:	            eurove+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ eurovinie:	            eurove+N+Sg+Com




LEXICON AATORE_LOAN
         :ator N_ODD      ;
  +Err/Orth:to   UVRE_LOAN  ;
 +Err/Orth:tor  N_ODD_LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: administraatore# ODD-syllable test
!!€ administraatore:                  administraatore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ administraatorem:                 administraatore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ administraatoren:	              administraatore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ administraatorisnie:	          administraatore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ administraatoristie:	          administraatore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ administraatorinie:	              administraatore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON AKTORE_LOAN
            :aktor  N_ODD_LOAN ;
   +Err/Orth:aktovr   X_NIEJTE  ;
   +Err/Orth:aktovr   N_ODD_LOAN  ;
   +Err/Orth:aaktor N_ODD      ;
   +Err/Orth:aktor    X_NIEJTEnotODD ; ! A-dure, kantore

!!€gt-norm: faktore# Even-syllable test
!!€ faktore:                  faktore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ faktorem:                 faktore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ faktoren:	              faktore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ faktorisnie:	          faktore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ faktoristie:	          faktore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ faktorinie:	              faktore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON EKTORE_LOAN
        +v1:ektor  N_ODD_LOAN ;
        +v2:ektovr  X_NIEJTE  ;
  +Err/Orth:eektor N_ODD      ;
   +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ektor    R      ; ! A-dur-

LEXICON ORE_LOAN
        +v1:or N_ODD_LOAN ;
        +v2:ovr  X_NIEJTE  ; 
   +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:or    R      ; ! A-dur-



! Even - syllabic case inflection
! -------------------------------

! Inflection for nouns ending in '-ie'
! ------------------------------------

LEXICON BURRIE
       +v2:buer  N_IE ;
       +v1:burr  N_IE ;
       
LEXICON N_IE
   N_IE_FORMS ;

LEXICON N_IE_FORMS
                     +Sg:             N_IE_SG  ;
                     +Pl:             N_IE_PL  ;
                                      N_IE_ESS ;
               +Cmp/SgNom:ie           R        ;
               +Cmp/SgGen:ie%>n        R        ;
         +Cmp/PlGen+NoUml:ie%>j        R        ;
           +Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi    R        ;
       +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE ;
 +Der1+Der/ijes+A+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLijes FINAL1   ;
          +Der1+Der/ijes+A:%»%^1UMLijes ATTR_0   ;
          +Der1+Der/ijes+A:%»%^1UMLij   ODDCOMP  ;
           +Der2+Der/Car+A:%»eht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;

LEXICON N_IE_SG
   N_IE_SG_NOM ;
   N_IE_SG_OBL ;

LEXICON N_IE_SG_NOM
 +Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
 
 
 ! Se nærmere på disse Px-ene
