src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin ! Dette er lemma som kan få flere possesive suffikser enn andre lemma.
aajkohke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:aajkahk DAKTERE ;
aajkohke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:aajkoehk DAKTERE ;
enaresaemie+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Lang+Use/NotDNorm:enare#saem N_IE ; !  Maja: fra GG, bedre med Anársaemie?
raerieburrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:raerie# BURRIE ;
LEXICON NounNoPx
assessore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:assess ORE_LOAN ;
atomreaktore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:atom#re^ AKTORE_LOAN ;
australijeenere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:australi IJEENERE_LOAN ;
båatsoeburrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:båatsoe# BURRIE ;
baersieldimmie+N+Sem/Act:baersieldimm N_IE ;
batterieliminaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:batteri#elimina AATORE_LOAN ;
burrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum: BURRIE ;
daktere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:daktar DAKTERE "gift datter" ;
detektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:det EKTORE_LOAN ;
duekie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Feat:duek N_IE ;
duplikaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:du^plika AATORE_LOAN ;
ekonomiprofessore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:ökonomi#profess ORE_LOAN ;
faamoefaktore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:faamoe#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
fosfore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:fosf ORE_LOAN ;
geellege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:geelleg DAKTERE ;
generaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:genera AATORE_LOAN ;
girpie+N+Sem/Dummytag:girp N_IE ;
gladijaatore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gladi IJAATORE_LOAN ;
gymnaslektore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:gymnas#l EKTORE_LOAN ;
indijaanere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:indi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
italijeenere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:itali IJEENERE_LOAN ;
jeeluveburrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jeeluve# BURRIE ;
kartesijaanere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:kartesi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
klæjmafaktore+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:klijma#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
kollektivsektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org:kollektiv#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
kommutaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kommuta AATORE_LOAN ;
kompressore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kom^press ORE_LOAN ;
kontaktore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kont AKTORE_LOAN ;
kultuvresektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kultuvre#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
kuraatore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:kura AATORE_LOAN ;
liberijaanere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:liberi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
mandsjurijaanere+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:mandsjuri IJAANERE_LOAN ;
minngiebielie+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc-water:minngie-#biel N_IE ;
minusfaktore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:minus#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
nestore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:nest ORE_LOAN ;
nigerijaanere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:nigeri IJAANERE_LOAN ;
pelagijaanere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:pelagi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
pijaanove+N+Sem/Dummytag:pi IJAANOVE_LOAN ;
projektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:proj EKTORE_LOAN ;
prokuraatore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:prokura AATORE_LOAN ;
radijaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:radi IJAATORE_LOAN ;
reaktore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:rej AKTORE_LOAN ;
rovtore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:rovt ORE_LOAN ;
såajaburrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:såaja# BURRIE ;
sektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:s EKTORE_LOAN ;
sïbjege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sïbjeg DAKTERE ; !Px-lexicon
skuvleviermie+N+Sem/Tool-catch:skuvle#vierm N_IE ;
spïdtjeburrie+N+Sem/Dummytag:spïdtje# BURRIE ;
stressfaktore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:stressf AKTORE_LOAN ;
teologiprofessore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:teologi#profess ORE_LOAN ;
tjeerege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:tjeereg DAKTERE ;
totalisaatore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:totalisa AATORE_LOAN ;
transportsektore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:transport#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
tseaktseburrie+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:tseaktse# BURRIE ;
viktorijaanere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:viktori IJAANERE_LOAN ;
gïeleduekie+N+Sem/Plc:gïele#duek N_IE ;
eurove+N+Sem/Money:eur OVE_LOAN ;
baanghkekontove+N+Sem/Dummytag:baanghke#kont OVE_LOAN ;
tjåanghkoedaatove+N+Sem/Dummytag:tjåanghkoe#daat OVE_LOAN ;
